Utah statutes.
16-6a-1013.   Approval by third persons.
(1)  The articles of incorporation may require an amendment to the articles of
incorporation or bylaws to be approved in writing by a specified person or
persons other than the board of directors.
(2)  A provision permitted under Subsection (1) may only be amended with the
approval in writing of the person or persons specified in the provision.
